Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.040

Judgment no bar to further action.

A judgment in favor of a party for one delinquency shall not preclude the same or another party from maintaining another action on the same bond for another delinquency.

[Code 1881 s 655; 1877 p 136 s 658; 1869 p 153 s 595; RRS s 961.]